Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 3. State Board of Public Contractors

§ 31-3-1.
Definitions.

The following words, as used in this chapter, shall have the meanings specified below:

“Board”: The State Board of Contractors created under this chapter.

“Contractor”: Any person contracting or undertaking as prime contractor, subcontractor or sub-subcontractor of any tier to do any erection, building, construction, reconstruction, demolition, repair, maintenance or related work on any public or private project; however, “contractor” shall not include any owner of a dwelling or other structure to be constructed, altered, repaired or improved and not for sale, lease, public use or assembly, or any person duly permitted by the Mississippi State Oil and Gas Board, pursuant to Section 53-3-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, to conduct operations within the state, and acting pursuant to said permit. It is further provided that nothing herein shall apply to:

Any contract or undertaking on a public or private project by a prime contractor, subcontractor or sub-subcontractor of any tier involving erection, building, construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or related work where such contract, subcontract or undertaking is less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00);

Highway construction, highway bridges, overpasses and any other project incidental to the construction of highways which are designated as federal aid projects and in which federal funds are involved;

A residential project to be occupied by fifty (50) or fewer families and not more than three (3) stories in height;

A residential subdivision where the contractor is developing either single-family or multifamily lots;

A new commercial construction project not exceeding seventy-five hundred (7500) square feet and not more than two (2) stories in height undertaken by an individual or entity licensed under the provisions of Section 73-59-1 et seq.;

Erection of a microwave tower built for the purpose of telecommunication transmissions;

Any contract or undertaking on a public project by a prime contractor, subcontractor or sub-subcontractor of any tier involving the construction, reconstruction, repair or maintenance of fire protection systems where such contract, subcontract or undertaking is less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00);

Any contract or undertaking on a private project by a prime contractor, subcontractor or sub-subcontractor of any tier involving the construction, reconstruction, repair or maintenance of fire protection systems where such contract, subcontract or undertaking is less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00);

Any contract or undertaking on a private or public project by a prime contractor, subcontractor or sub-subcontractor of any tier involving the construction, reconstruction, repair or maintenance of technically specialized installations if performed by a Mississippi contractor who has been in the business of installing fire protection sprinkler systems on or before July 1, 2000; or

Any contractor undertaking to build, construct, reconstruct, repair, demolish, perform maintenance on, or other related work, whether on the surface or subsurface, on oil or gas wells, pipelines, processing plants, or treatment facilities or other structures of facilities. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit the application or effect of Section 31-5-41.

“Certificate of responsibility”: A certificate numbered and held by a contractor issued by the board under the provisions of this chapter after payment of the special privilege license tax therefor levied under this chapter.

“Person”: Any person, firm, corporation, joint venture or partnership, association or other type of business entity.

“Private project”: Any project for erection, building, construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or related work which is not funded in whole or in part with public funds.

“Public agency”: Any board, commission, council or agency of the State of Mississippi or any district, county or municipality thereof, including school, hospital, airport and all other types of governing agencies created by or operating under the laws of this state.

“Public funds”: Monies of public agencies, whether obtained from taxation, donation or otherwise; or monies being expended by public agencies for the purposes for which such public agencies exist.

“Public project”: Any project for erection, building, construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or related work which is funded in whole or in part with public funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-01; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 393, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-2.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter, is to protect the health, safety and general welfare of all persons dealing with those who are engaged in the vocation of contracting and to afford such persons an effective and practical protection against incompetent, inexperienced, unlawful and fraudulent acts of contractors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 31-3-3.
Composition of board; removal; filling of vacancies.

There is hereby created the State Board of Contractors of the State of Mississippi, which shall consist of ten (10) members who shall be appointed by the Governor. All appointments to the board shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate. Two (2) road contractors; two (2) building contractors; two (2) residential builders as defined in Section 73-59-1; one (1) plumbing or heating and air-conditioning contractor; one (1) electrical contractor; and one (1) water and sewer contractor shall compose the board. The Governor shall appoint one (1) additional member who shall be a roofing contractor and whose term of office shall be five (5) years. Each member shall be an actual resident of the State of Mississippi and must have been actually engaged in the contracting business for a period of not less than ten (10) years before appointment. The initial terms of the two (2) residential builders shall be for two (2) and four (4) years, respectively.

Upon the expiration of the term of office of any member of the board, the Governor shall appoint a new member for a term of five (5) years, such new appointments being made so as to maintain on the board two (2) building contractors; two (2) road contractors; two (2) residential builders; one (1) plumbing or heating and air-conditioning contractor; one (1) electrical contractor; and one (1) water and sewer contractor; and one (1) roofing contractor. The Governor shall fill any vacancy by appointment, such appointee to serve the balance of the term of the original appointee. The Governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetency or willful neglect of duty.

In the event the Governor fails to appoint a member of the board within twelve (12) months of the occurrence of the vacancy, such vacancy shall be filled by majority vote of the board, subject to advice and consent of the Senate and the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-02; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 393, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 524, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 8; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 534, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1995, ch. 431, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 345, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 375, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 556, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 433, § 11; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-5.
Organization and administration.

The board shall be assigned suitable office space at the seat of government and shall elect one (1) of its members as chairman and one (1) as vice chairman; and each shall perform the usual duties of such offices. The board may adopt a seal. Six (6) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and a majority vote of those present and voting at any meeting shall be necessary for the transaction of any business coming before the board. Members must be present to cast votes on any and all business. The executive director shall serve as secretary of the board. The board is authorized to employ such personnel as shall be necessary in the performance of its duties including sufficient administrative and clerical staff to process and review applications for certificates of responsibility, to prepare and administer tests therefor, to investigate applications for certificates of responsibility and to inspect work performed by contractors as may be necessary to enforce and carry out the purpose of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 9; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 382, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 534, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 345, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, ch. 375, § 12; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2009, ch. 556, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 433, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-7.
Meetings.

The board shall have four (4) regular meetings in each year, one (1) on the second Wednesday in January, one (1) on the second Wednesday in April, one (1) on the second Wednesday in July, and one (1) on the second Wednesday in October, at its offices at the seat of government or through the means of teleconference or video conferencing in accordance with Section 25-41-5. If the regular meeting day falls on a legal holiday, the board shall meet on the next day. The board may hold such special meetings as it finds necessary. However, before any special meeting is held, a notice stating the time, place and primary purpose of such meeting shall be sent by certified or registered mail from the chairman or vice chairman of the board to the other members of the board at least five (5) days before such meeting. Certificates of responsibility shall be issued at any time during the course of a calendar year as prescribed by the rules and regulations of the board. All meetings shall be held in the State of Mississippi. At any regular or special meeting the board may recess from time to time to reconvene on a day and time fixed by an order of the board entered upon its minutes.

The holder of a valid certificate of responsibility shall disclose to the owner or other person with whom the holder is contracting at the signing of a contract or the initial agreement to perform work whether the holder carries general liability insurance. The disclosure shall be written, the structure and composition of which shall be determined by the State Board of Contractors, and shall be placed immediately before the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the purchaser. The disclosure shall be boldfaced and conspicuous type which is larger than the type of the remaining text of the contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-04; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 4; Laws, 1960, ch. 393, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 363 § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 525, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-9.
Compensation of members.

The members of the board shall be entitled to receive a per diem as provided in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, when actually engaged in the business of the board, together with their actual and necessary traveling and subsistence expenses incurred on behalf of board business, upon itemized statements of same as provided by general law in the case of other state employees. Such statements shall be paid only after the same have been approved by order on the minutes of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 31-3-11.
Executive director.

The board shall elect and fix the salary of an executive director, and the board may terminate the employment of such executive director at any time the board deems the same advisable. The board shall require the executive director to file bond in such amount as the board may deem necessary, and shall specify the duties of such employee. The premium on any such bond shall be paid from the funds provided by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-06; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 6; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 6; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 7; Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-13.
Powers and duties.

The board shall have the following powers and responsibilities:

To receive applications for certificates of responsibility, to investigate and examine applicants for same by holding hearings and securing information, to conduct examinations, and to issue certificates of responsibility to such contractors as the board finds to be responsible.

All original certificates and renewals shall expire one (1) year from the date of issuance. Application for renewal of certificates of responsibility, together with the payment of a special privilege license tax as provided under this chapter, shall serve to extend the current certificate until the board either renews the certificate or denies the application.

No certificate of responsibility or any renewal thereof shall be issued until the applicant furnishes to the board his Mississippi state sales tax number or Mississippi state use tax number and his state income tax identification numbers.

Additional fees may be required as provided in Section 31-3-14.

The board shall conduct an objective, standardized examination of an applicant for a certificate to ascertain the ability of the applicant to make practical application of his knowledge of the profession or business of construction in the category or categories for which he has applied for a certificate of responsibility. The board may administer an oral examination to applicants who are unable to take the written examination. The cost of the test and the cost of administering the test shall be paid for by applicants for certificates of responsibility at the time applications are filed. The board shall investigate thoroughly the past record of all applicants, which will include an effort toward ascertaining the qualifications of applicants in reading plans and specifications, estimating costs, construction ethics, and other similar matters. The board shall take all applicants under consideration after having examined him or them and go thoroughly into the records and examinations, prior to granting any certificate of responsibility. If the applicant is an individual, examination may be taken by his personal appearance for examination or by the appearance for examination of one or more of his responsible managing employees; and if a copartnership or corporation or any other combination or organization, by the examination of one or more of the responsible managing officers or members of the executive staff of the applicant’s firm, according to its own designation, and such person shall be known as the qualifying party. A qualifying party may serve no more than three (3) separate entities as the qualifying party without first appearing before the board and being granted special permission.

To conduct thorough investigations of all applicants seeking renewal of their licenses and of all complaints filed with the board concerning the performance of a contractor on a public or private project.

To obtain information concerning the responsibility of any applicant for a certificate of responsibility or a holder of a certificate of responsibility under this chapter. Such information may be obtained by investigation, by hearings, or by any other reasonable and lawful means. The board shall keep such information appropriately filed and shall disseminate same to any interested person. The board shall have the power of subpoena.

To maintain a list of contractors to whom certificates of responsibility are issued, refused, revoked or suspended, which list shall be available to any interested person. Such list shall indicate the kind or kinds of works or projects for which a certificate of responsibility was issued, refused, revoked or suspended.

To issue a citation to anyone performing work without having a valid certificate of responsibility as required by this chapter.

To revoke by order entered on its minutes a certificate of responsibility upon a finding by the board that a particular contractor or qualifying party is not responsible, and to suspend such certificate of responsibility in particular cases pending investigation, upon cause to be stated in the board’s order of suspension. No such revocation or suspension shall be ordered without a hearing conducted upon not less than ten (10) days’ notice to such certificate holder by certified or registered mail, wherein the holder of the certificate of responsibility shall be given an opportunity to present all lawful evidence which he may offer.

To adopt rules and regulations setting forth the requirements for certificates of responsibility, the revocation or suspension thereof, and all other matters concerning same; rules and regulations governing the conduct of the business of the board and its employees; and such other rules and regulations as the board finds necessary for the proper administration of this chapter, including those for the conduct of its hearings on the revocation or suspension of certificates of responsibility. Such rules and regulations shall not conflict with the provisions of this chapter.

The board shall have the power and responsibility to classify the kind or kinds of works or projects that a contractor is qualified and entitled to perform under the certificate of responsibility issued to him. Such classification shall be specified in the certificate of responsibility.

The powers of the State Board of Contractors shall not extend to fixing a maximum limit in the bid amount of any contractor, or the bonding capacity, or a maximum amount of work which a contractor may have under contract at any time, except as stated in paragraph (a) of this section; and the Board of Contractors shall not have jurisdiction or the power or authority to determine the maximum bond a contractor may be capable of obtaining. The board, in determining the qualifications of any applicant for an original certificate of responsibility or any renewal thereof, shall, among other things, take into consideration the following: (i) experience and ability, (ii) character, (iii) the manner of performance of previous contracts, (iv) financial condition, (v) equipment, (vi) personnel, (vii) work completed, (viii) work on hand, (ix) ability to perform satisfactorily work under contract at the time of an application for a certificate of responsibility or a renewal thereof, (x) default in complying with provisions of this law, or any other law of the state, and (xi) the results of objective, standardized examinations. A record shall be made and preserved by the board of each examination of an applicant and the findings of the board thereon, and a certified copy of the record and findings shall be furnished to any applicant desiring to appeal from any order or decision of the board.

The board shall enter upon its minutes an order or decision upon each application filed with it, and it may state in such order or decision the reason or reasons for its order or decision.

Upon failure of the board to enter an order or decision upon its minutes as to any application within one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of filing such application, the applicant shall have the right of appeal as otherwise provided by this chapter.

The holder of a valid certificate of responsibility shall disclose to the owner or other person with whom the holder is contracting at the signing of a contract or the initial agreement to perform work whether the holder carries general liability insurance. The disclosure shall be written, the structure and composition of which shall be determined by the State Board of Contractors, and shall be placed immediately before the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the purchaser. The disclosure shall be boldfaced and conspicuous type which is larger than the type of the remaining text of the contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-07; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 7; Laws, 1960, ch. 393, § 4; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 7; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 10; Laws, 1986, ch. 378; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 8; Laws, 1998, ch. 415, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 525, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-14.
Certificate of responsibility application and renewal fees; Construction Education Fund; creation; distribution of monies; restrictions; reports.

In addition to the fees required for application and renewal for certification and registration of all contractors in Section 31-3-13, all holders of a certificate of responsibility shall pay a fee equal to Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) at the time of application or renewal of certificates of responsibility. Any residential builder licensed under the provisions of Section 73-59-1 et seq. shall be exempt from the fee imposed under this section. The revenue derived from such additional fees shall be deposited into a fund to be known as the “Construction Education Fund,” a special fund created in the State Treasury, and distributed by the State Board of Contractors created in Section 31-3-3, to the Mississippi Construction Education Foundation, public high schools and community colleges that participate in the Mississippi Construction Education Foundation’s “school-to-work” program, state universities that have construction technology programs, the Mississippi Housing Institute and certain construction educational trusts approved by the State Board of Contractors in the manner hereinafter provided to offer courses for construction education and construction craft training to meet the needs of the construction industry of the State of Mississippi.

The State Board of Contractors shall, on an annual basis, solicit from the Mississippi state institutions of higher learning, all the public community and junior colleges, the Mississippi Construction Education Foundation, public high schools that participate in the Mississippi Construction Education Foundation’s “school-to-work” program and certain construction educational trusts, applications for the use of such funds in construction education and craft training programs in a manner prescribed by the board. The board may appoint a technical advisory committee to advise the board on the most needed areas of construction education and craft training, continuing education or research relating to the construction education and craft training in the state, based on significant changes in the construction industry’s practices, economic development or on problems costing public or private contractors substantial waste. The board shall ensure that the monies distributed from this fund are properly spent to promote construction education and craft training in programs in the state which are approved by the board. At least seventy-five percent (75%) of the monies distributed by the board, pursuant to this section, must be used for construction craft training with the exception of the Mississippi Housing Institute.

Each university, junior college, community college, the Mississippi Construction Education Foundation, public high school that participates in the foundation’s “school-to-work” program and construction educational trust receiving funds pursuant to this section for construction education or construction craft training programs shall utilize such funds only for construction education and craft training curricula and program development, faculty development, equipment, student scholarships, student assistantships, and for continuing education programs related to construction education and craft training. Such funds shall not be commingled with the normal operating funds of the educational institution, regardless of the source of such funds.

The State Board of Contractors shall ensure the distribution of reports and the availability of construction education programs established pursuant to this section to all segments of the construction industry that are subject to the fee provided under this section. The board shall cause a report to be made to the Legislature in October of each year, summarizing the allocation of funds by institution or program and summarizing the new projects funded and the status of previously funded projects.

All monies deposited into the Construction Education Fund shall be used exclusively for construction education and craft training, and any unspent funds at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund of the State Treasury but shall be available for construction education and craft training in subsequent fiscal years.

All monies deposited into the Construction Education Fund collected from residential builders licensed under the provisions of Section 73-59-1 et seq. shall be used exclusively for licensed home builders’ education and professional development and any unspent funds at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund of the State Treasury but shall be available for construction education and craft training in subsequent fiscal years.

All expenditures from the Construction Education Fund shall be by requisition to the State Auditor, signed by the executive director of the board and countersigned by the chairman or vice chairman of the board, and the State Treasurer shall issue his warrants thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 507, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-15.
Certificates of responsibility required for bid.

No contract for public or private projects shall be issued or awarded to any contractor who did not have a current certificate of responsibility issued by said board at the time of the submission of the bid, or a similar certificate issued by a similar board of another state which recognizes certificates issued by said board. Any contract issued or awarded in violation of this section shall be null and void.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-08; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 8; Laws, 1960, ch. 393, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 8; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 31-3-17.
Special privilege license tax; State Board of Contractors Fund.

There is hereby levied, in addition to any taxes otherwise provided for by law, a special privilege license tax of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) on each contractor who applies for a certificate of responsibility issued under this chapter; and such tax shall be paid to the executive director of the board upon making such application in this state. The board may levy an additional special privilege license tax not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each additional classification for which a contractor applies and is found to be qualified. The executive director of the board shall promptly deposit all monies received under this chapter in the State Treasury. Except for the civil penalty provided in Section 31-3-21 which shall be deposited into the State General Fund and the fee provided in Section 31-3-14, all monies received under this chapter shall be kept in a special fund in the State Treasury known as the “State Board of Contractors Fund,” and shall be used only for the purposes of this chapter. Such monies shall not lapse at the end of each fiscal year, but all monies in such State Board of Contractors Fund in excess of the sum of fifty percent (50%) of the approved budget for the fiscal year shall be paid over into the General Fund of the State Treasury. All expenditures from the Board of Contractors Fund shall be by requisition to the State Auditor, signed by the executive director of the board and countersigned by the chairman or vice chairman of the board, and the State Treasurer shall issue warrants thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-10; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 10; Laws, 1970, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 9; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 12; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 10; Laws, 1992, ch. 505, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 415, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 358, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 346, § 1, eff from after passage (approved April 19, 2004).

[Codes, 1942, § 8968-09; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 9; Laws, 1960, ch. 393, § 6; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 10; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1988.]

§ 31-3-21.
Bidding and awards.

It shall be unlawful for any person who does not hold a certificate of responsibility issued under this chapter to submit a bid, enter into a contract, or otherwise engage in or continue in this state in the business of a contractor, as defined in this chapter. Any bid which is submitted without a certificate of responsibility number issued under this chapter and without that number appearing on the exterior of the bid envelope, as and if herein required, at the time designated for the opening of such bid, shall not be considered further, and the person or public agency soliciting bids shall not enter into a contract with a contractor submitting a bid in violation of this section. In addition, any person violating this section by knowingly and willfully submitting a bid for projects without holding a certificate of responsibility number issued under this chapter, as and if herein required, at the time of the submission or opening of such bid shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

All bids submitted for public or private projects where the bid is in excess of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) shall contain on the outside or exterior of the envelope or container of such bid the contractor’s current certificate number, and no bid shall be opened or considered unless such contractor’s current certificate number appears on the outside or exterior of said envelope or container, or unless there appears a statement on the outside or exterior of such envelope or container to the effect that the bid enclosed therewith did not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) with respect to public or private projects. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

In the letting of public contracts preference shall be given to resident contractors, and a nonresident bidder domiciled in a state having laws granting preference to local contractors shall be awarded Mississippi public contracts only on the same basis as the nonresident bidder’s state awards contracts to Mississippi contractors bidding under similar circumstances; and resident contractors actually domiciled in Mississippi, be they corporate, individuals, or partnerships, are to be granted preference over nonresidents in awarding of contracts in the same manner and to the same extent as provided by the laws of the state of domicile of the nonresident. When a nonresident contractor submits a bid for a public project, he shall attach thereto a copy of his resident state’s current preference law, if any, pertaining to such state’s treatment of nonresident contractors. Any bid submitted by a nonresident contractor which does not include the nonresident contractor’s current state law shall be rejected and not considered for award. As used in this section, the term “resident contractors” includes a nonresident person, firm or corporation that has been qualified to do business in this state and has maintained a permanent full-time office in the State of Mississippi for two (2) years prior to submission of the bid and the subsidiaries and affiliates of such a person, firm or corporation. Any public agency awarding a contract shall promptly report to the Department of Revenue the following information:

The amount of the contract.

The name and address of the contractor reviewing the contract.

The name and location of the project.

In addition to any other penalties provided in this chapter, and upon a finding of a violation of this chapter, the State Board of Contractors may, after notice and hearing, issue an order of abatement directing the contractor to cease all actions constituting violations of this chapter until such time as the contractor complies with Mississippi state law, and to pay to the board a civil penalty to be deposited into the State Board of Contractors’ Fund, created in Section 31-3-17, of not more than three percent (3%) of the total contract being performed by the contractor. In addition to, or in lieu of, such civil penalty, the board may issue a public or private reprimand. The funds collected from civil penalty payments shall be used by the State Board of Contractors for enforcement and education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-11; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 11; Laws, 1960, ch. 393, § 7; Laws, 1968, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 11; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 13; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 12; Laws, 1992, ch. 505, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 383, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-23.
Appeals.

Within ten (10) days after any order, judgment or action of the board, any person aggrieved thereby may appeal such order, judgment or action either to the chancery court of the county wherein the appellant resides or to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, upon giving bond with sufficient security in the amount of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), approved by the clerk of the chancery court and conditioned to pay any costs which may be adjudged against such person. In lieu of the bond, the appellant may post Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) with the clerk of the chancery court and conditioned to pay any costs which may be adjudged against such person.

Notice of appeal shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery court, who shall issue a writ of certiorari directed to the board commanding it within forty-five (45) days after service thereof to certify to such court its entire record in the matter in which the appeal has been taken. The appeal shall thereupon be heard in due course by the court, and the court shall review the record and shall affirm or reverse the judgment. If the judgment is reversed, the chancery court or chancellor shall render such order or judgment as the board ought to have rendered, and certify the same to the board; and costs shall be awarded as in other cases.

Appeals may be had to the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi as provided by law from any final action of the chancery court. The board may employ counsel to defend such appeals, to be paid out of the funds in the State Board of Contractors Fund.

On appeal, any order, judgment or action of the board revoking a certificate of responsibility or residential license shall remain in full force unless the chancery court or Supreme Court reverses such order, judgment or action of the board.

The remedies provided under this chapter for any aggrieved person shall not be exclusive, but shall be cumulative of and supplemental to any other remedies which he may otherwise have in law or in equity, whether by injunction or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8968-12; Laws, 1958, ch. 473, § 12; Laws, 1980, ch. 498, § 12; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 14; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 13; Laws, 2015, ch. 410, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 31-3-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 527, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§31-3-25. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 301, § 30; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 15]